Hawaii statutes.
§490:8-502 Assertion of adverse claim
against entitlement holder. An action based on an adverse claim to a
financial asset, whether framed in conversion, replevin, constructive trust,
equitable lien, or other theory, may not be asserted against a person who
acquires a security entitlement under section 490:8-501 for value and without
notice of the adverse claim. [L 1997, c 33, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next